Washington statutes.
RCW 3.50.440

Penalty if no other punishment prescribed.

Every person convicted by the municipal court of a violation of the criminal provisions of an ordinance for which no punishment is specifically prescribed in the ordinance is guilty of a gross misdemeanor and shall be punished by a fine of not more than five thousand dollars or imprisonment in the city jail for up to three hundred sixty-four days, or both such fine and imprisonment.

[ 2011 c 96 s 2; 2003 c 53 s 3; 1984 c 258 s 120; 1961 c 299 s 93.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2011 c 96: See note following RCW 9A.20.021.

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.

Court Improvement Act of 1984—Effective dates—Severability—Short title—1984 c 258: See notes following RCW 3.30.010.

Application—1984 c 258 ss 101-139: See note following RCW 3.50.005.